District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0175.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Uniform College Athlete Name, Image, or Likeness Amendment Act of
2025.”
Sec. 2. Section 215 of the Uniform College Athlete Name, Image, or Likeness Act of
2022, effective February 23, 2023 (D.C. Law 24-245, D.C. Official Code § 38-1631.05), is
amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a
semicolon in its place.
(2) Paragraph (3) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a
semicolon in its place.
(3) New paragraphs (4) and (5) are added to read as follows:
“(4) With selecting, arranging for, or providing payment to a name, image, or
likeness agent; and
“(5) With selecting, arranging for, or collecting payment from a third party
engaged in specific name, image, or likeness agreements with a college athlete or athletes.”.
(b) Subsection (e) is repealed.
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602 (c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02 (c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2